California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 5.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

40215.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) If the department determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall
 mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(c) When the department releases a lien erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(d) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 56.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40216.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test,
 or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose a
 penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 20. EMERGENCY TELEPHONE USERS SURCHARGE ACT [41001. - 41176.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [41001. - 41019.5.]

41001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Emergency Telephone Users Surcharge Act”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41002.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41003.

“Person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, cooperative organization, fraternal organization, nonprofit organization, corporation, estate, trust, business or common law trust, receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors, trustee or trustee in bankruptcy.

“Person” does not include a nonprofit hospital, nonprofit educational organization, or a public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 73.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

41004.

“Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41005.

“In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within those limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41006.

“Public agency” means this state, and any city, county, city and county, municipal corporation, public district, or public authority located in whole or in part within this state which provides or has authority to provide firefighting, police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.

(a) “Service supplier” shall mean a person supplying an access line to a service user in this state.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 4.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.1.

“Access line” shall mean any of the following:

(a) A wireline communications service line.

(b) A wireless communications service line.

(c) A VoIP service line, as defined by Section 41016.5 as added by the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 5.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.2.

(a) “Wireline communications service” shall mean a local exchange service provided at a physical location in this state that allows the user to make an outbound communication to the 911 emergency communications system.

(b) For the purposes of the surcharge imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41020):

(1) A wireline communications service access line does not include a direct inward dialing number, extension, or other similar feature that routes an inbound call and cannot provide access to the 911 emergency communications system.

(2) The number of
 surcharges imposed shall not exceed the total number of concurrent outbound calls that can be placed to the emergency communications system at a single point of time.

(c) This definition shall apply only to this part.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2023, a “wireline communications service” shall include a local exchange service provided at a physical location in this state that allows the user to make an outbound communication to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, as defined in the Miles Hall Lifeline and Suicide Prevention Act (Article 6.3 (commencing with Section 53123.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 19.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.3.

(a) (1) (A) “Wireless communications service line” shall mean a telecommunications service provided to an end user with a place of primary use in this state that allows the end user to make an outbound communication to the 911 emergency communications system.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2023, a “wireless communications
 service line” shall include a telecommunications service provided to an end user with a place of primary use in this state that allows the user to make an outbound communication to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, as defined in the Miles Hall Lifeline and Suicide Prevention Act (Article 6.3 (commencing with Section 53123.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) A wireless communications service line shall not include prepaid mobile telephony service.

(b) For the purposes of the surcharge imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41020), not more than one 911 surcharge
 and one 988 surcharge may be imposed per wireless communications service line number assigned to an end user of mobile telecommunications service.

(c) The definition of “wireless communication services line” shall apply only to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 6.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.4.

“Purchase” means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 8.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.5.

For purposes of this part, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Prepaid consumer” means a person who purchases prepaid mobile telephony services in a retail transaction.

(b) “Prepaid mobile telephony services” means the right to utilize a mobile device for mobile telecommunications services or information services, including the download of digital products
 delivered electronically, content, and ancillary services, or both telecommunications services and information services, that must be purchased in advance of usage in predetermined units or dollars. For these purposes, “telecommunications service” and “information service” have the same meanings as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(c) “Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services, either alone or in combination with mobile data or other services, from a seller for any purpose other than resale in the regular course of business.

(d) “Seller” means a person that sells prepaid mobile telephony service to a person in a retail transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 9.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41008.

As used in this part, “month” shall mean a calendar month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41009.

(a) “Service user” means any person that subscribes for the right to utilize an access line in this state who is required to pay a surcharge under the provisions of this part.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 11.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41010.

“Access line in this state” means a telephone line, as defined in Section 233 of the Public Utilities Code, associated with a billing address located in California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 43.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41012.

“Public telephone” means any coin-operated telephone provided by the serving telephone company accessible to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41013.

“Surcharge” means a tax or taxes levied by this state. Commencing January 1, 2023, “surcharge,” or “surcharges” as used in this part, refers to two separate charges, one related to 911 service and one related to 988 service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 7.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41016.5.

(a) “VoIP service” means any service that satisfies the requirements set forth in paragraph (1) and (2).

(1) Does all of the following:

(A) Enables real-time, two-way voice communication that originates from and terminates to the user’s location using Internet Protocol (IP) or any successor protocol.

(B) Requires a broadband connection from the user’s location.

(C) Permits users, generally, to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

(2) Does at least one of the following:

(A) Requires Internet Protocol-compatible
 customer premises equipment (CPE).

(B) When necessary, is converted to or from transmission control protocol (TCP)/IP by the service user’s service supplier before or after being switched by the public switched telephone network.

(C) Is a service that the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) has affirmatively required to provide 911 service.

(b) For the purposes of the surcharge imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41020), both of the following shall apply:

(1) A VoIP service line does not include a direct inward dialing number, extension, or other similar feature that routes an inbound call and cannot provide direct access to the 911 emergency communications system.

(2) The
 number of surcharges imposed shall not exceed the total number of concurrent outbound calls that can be placed to the emergency communications system at a single point of time.

(c) This definition shall only apply to this part.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 13.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41019.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that telephone quality communication utilizing VoIP shall not be regulated by the enactment of Senate Bill 1040 of the 2007–08 Regular Session. The sole purpose of this act is to ensure that all forms of telephonic quality communications that connect to the “911” emergency system contribute to the State Emergency Telephone Number Account and that this act may not be used by a court or administrative body for any purpose other than to interpret and apply this part.

(b) For purposes of this section only, “VoIP” means any service that:

(1) Enables real-time or two-way voice communication that originates or terminates from the user’s location using IP or any successor protocol.

(2) Uses a broadband connection from the user’s location, including any service that permits users, generally, to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 17, Sec. 6.   Effective May 21, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Surcharges [41020. - 41041.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of the Surcharges [41020. - 41028.]

41020.

(a) (1) (A) On and after January 1, 2020, a 911 surcharge is hereby imposed on each access line for each month or part thereof for which a service user subscribes with a service supplier, at an amount determined under Article 2 (commencing with Section 41030). Beginning January 1, 2023, a separate 988 surcharge is hereby imposed on each access line for each month or part thereof for which a service user subscribes with a service supplier, at an amount determined under Article 2 (commencing with Section 41030).

(B) The surcharges shall be paid by the service user as hereinafter provided.

(2) On and after January 1, 2020, the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services in this state shall be subject to the 911 surcharge set forth under Article 2 (commencing with Section 41030). The surcharge shall be paid by the prepaid consumer in accordance with Section 41028 and remitted and administered in accordance with this part. Beginning January 1, 2023, a separate 988 surcharge is hereby imposed on the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services, at an amount determined under Article 2 (commencing with Section 41030).

(b) The surcharges imposed shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) In accordance with the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (Public Law 106-252), which is incorporated herein by reference, to any charges for mobile telecommunications services billed to a customer where those services are provided, or deemed provided, to a customer whose place of primary use is outside this state. Mobile telecommunications services shall be deemed provided by a customer’s home service provider to the customer if those services are provided in a taxing jurisdiction to the customer, and the charges for those services are billed by or for the customer’s home service provider.

(2) To any charges for VoIP service billed to a customer where those services are provided to a customer whose place of primary use of VoIP service is outside this state.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Charges for mobile telecommunications services” means any charge for, or associated with, the provision of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as in effect on June 1, 1999, or any charge for, or associated with, a service provided as an adjunct to a commercial mobile radio service, that is billed to the customer by or for the customer’s home service provider, regardless of whether individual transmissions originate or terminate within the licensed service area of the home service provider.

(2) “Customer” means (A) the person or entity that contracts with the home service provider for mobile telecommunications services, or with a VoIP service provider for VoIP
 service, or (B) if the end user of mobile telecommunications services or VoIP service is not the contracting party, the end user of the mobile telecommunications service or VoIP service. This paragraph applies only for the purpose of determining the place of primary use. The term “customer” does not include (A) a reseller of mobile telecommunications service or VoIP communication service, or (B) a serving carrier under an arrangement to serve the mobile customer outside the home service provider’s licensed service area.

(3) “Home service provider” means the facilities-based carrier or reseller with which the customer contracts for the provision of mobile telecommunications services.

(4) “Licensed service area” means the geographic area in which the home service
 provider is authorized by law or contract to
 provide commercial mobile radio service to the customer.

(5) “Mobile telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as in effect on June 1, 1999.

(6) “Place of primary use” means the street address representative of where the customer’s use of the mobile telecommunications service or VoIP service primarily occurs, that must be:

(A) The residential street address or the primary business street address of the customer.

(B) With respect to mobile telecommunications service, within the licensed service area of the home service provider.

(7) (A) “Reseller” means a provider who purchases telecommunications services or VoIP service from another telecommunications service provider or VoIP service and then resells the services, or uses the services as a component part of, or integrates the purchased services into, a mobile telecommunications service or VoIP service.

(B) “Reseller” does not include a serving carrier with which a home service provider arranges for the services to its customers outside the home service provider’s licensed service area.

(8) “Serving carrier” means a facilities-based carrier providing mobile telecommunications service to a customer outside a home service provider’s or reseller’s licensed area.

(9) “Taxing jurisdiction” means any of the several states, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the United States, any municipality, city, county, township, parish, transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction, or any other political subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.

(10) “VoIP service provider” means that provider of VoIP service with whom the end user customer contracts for the provision of VoIP services for the customer’s own use and not for resale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 10.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41021.

(a) A service supplier shall collect the surcharges from each service user at the time it collects its billings from the service user. The duty to collect the surcharges from a service user shall commence with the beginning of the first regular billing period applicable to that person which starts on or after the operative date of the surcharge imposed by this part. If the stations or lines of more than one service supplier are utilized in furnishing the telephone communication services to the service user, the service supplier that bills the customer shall collect the surcharges from the customer.

(b) Only one payment per month under this part shall be required with respect to
 the surcharges on an access line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 20.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41022.

(a) The surcharges required to be collected by the service supplier shall each be added to and stated separately in its billings to the service user.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a service supplier may elect to combine the 911 and 988 surcharges into a single-line item on the service user billing. If the service supplier elects to combine the surcharges, the combined surcharge shall be labeled as the “911/988 Surcharge” on the service user’s bill. The service supplier shall remit the combined surcharges to the department in separate amounts
 for each surcharge on forms prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 12.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41023.

The surcharges required to be collected by the service supplier, and any amount unreturned to the service user that is not owed as part of the surcharges but was collected from the service user under the representation by the service supplier that it was owed as part of the surcharges, constitute debts owed by the service supplier to this state.

A
 service supplier that has collected any amount of surcharges in excess of the amount of surcharges imposed by this part and actually due from a service user, may refund that amount to the service user, even though the surcharge amounts have already been paid over to the department and a corresponding credit or refund has not yet been secured. The service supplier may claim credit for that overpayment refund against the amount of surcharges imposed by this part that is due upon any other return, providing that credit is claimed in a return dated no later
 than three years from the date of overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 13.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41024.

Every service user in this state is liable for the surcharges until they have been paid to this state, except that payment to a service supplier registered under this part is sufficient to relieve the service user from further liability for the surcharges.

Any surcharge collected from
 a service user that has not been remitted to the department shall be deemed a debt owed to the state by the person required to collect and remit that surcharge. Nothing in this part shall impose any obligation upon a service supplier to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the surcharges imposed by this part. The service supplier shall provide the department with amounts uncollected which total three dollars ($3) or more on a cumulative basis with respect to a single service user along with the names, addresses, and reasons of the service users refusing to pay the surcharges imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 14.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41027.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as imposing a surcharge upon access lines or on the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services if imposition of that surcharge would be in violation of the Constitution of the United States, the United States Code, or the laws of the
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 56.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41028.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2020, the surcharge amounts imposed by Section 41020 on the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services in this state shall be collected by a seller from each prepaid consumer at the time of each retail transaction in this state. The surcharges shall be imposed at an amount as determined under Article 2 (commencing with Section 41030) on each retail transaction that occurs in this state.

(2) (A) The amount of the surcharges shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services by the seller, or otherwise disclosed
 electronically to the prepaid consumer, at the time of the retail transaction.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a seller may elect to combine the 911 and 988 surcharges into a single-line item. If the seller elects to combine the surcharges, the combined surcharge shall be labeled as the “911/988 Surcharge” on the invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services by the seller, or otherwise disclosed electronically to the prepaid consumer, at the time of the retail transaction. The seller shall remit the combined surcharges to the department in separate amounts for each surcharge on forms prescribed by the department.

(b) (1) The surcharges that are required to be collected by a seller and
 any amount unreturned to the prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services that is not owed as part of the surcharges, but was collected from the prepaid consumer under the representation by the seller that it was owed as part of the surcharges, constitutes debts owed by the seller to this state.

(2) A seller that has collected any amount of surcharge in excess of the amount of the surcharges imposed by this part and actually due from a prepaid consumer may refund that amount to the prepaid consumer, even though the surcharge amounts have already been paid over to the department and a corresponding credit or refund has not yet been secured. The seller may claim credit for that overpayment refund against the amount of surcharges imposed by this part that is due upon any other return, providing that credit is claimed in a return dated no
 later than three years from the date of overpayment.

(c) (1) Every prepaid consumer of prepaid mobile telephony services in this state is liable for the surcharges until they have been paid to this state, except that payment to a seller registered under this part relieves the prepaid consumer from further liability for the surcharges. Any surcharge collected from a prepaid consumer that have not been remitted to the department shall be a debt owed to the state by the person required to collect and remit the surcharges. Nothing in this part shall impose any obligation upon a seller to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the surcharge imposed by this section.

(2) A credit shall be allowed against, but shall not exceed, the surcharge amounts imposed
 on any prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services by this part to the extent that the prepaid consumer has paid surcharges on the purchase to any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia. The credit shall be apportioned to the charges against which it is allowed in proportion to the amounts of those charges.

(d) A seller is relieved from liability to collect the surcharges imposed by this part that became due and payable, insofar as the base upon which the surcharges are imposed is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the seller or, if the seller is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A seller that has previously paid the surcharges may, under rules and regulations
 prescribed by the department take as a deduction on its return the amount found worthless and charged off by the seller. If any such accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the seller, the amounts so collected shall be included in the first return filed after such collection and the surcharges shall be paid with the return.

(e) For purposes of this section, a retail transaction occurs in the state under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The prepaid consumer makes the retail transaction in person at a business location in the state (point-of-sale transaction).

(2) If paragraph (1) is not applicable, the prepaid consumer’s address is in the state (known-address transaction). A known-address
 transaction occurs in the state under any of the following circumstances:

(A) The retail sale involves shipping of an item to be delivered to, or picked up by, the prepaid consumer at a location in the state.

(B) If the prepaid consumer’s address is known by the seller to be in the state, including if the seller’s records maintained in the ordinary course of business indicate that the prepaid consumer’s address is in the state and the records are not made or kept in bad faith.

(C) The prepaid consumer provides an address during consummation of the retail transaction that is in the state, including an address provided with respect to the payment instrument if no other address is available and the address is not given in bad
 faith.

(3) If an address is not available to the seller to determine whether any of the circumstances in paragraph (2) exist, the transaction will be deemed to be a known-address transaction occurring in this state if the mobile telephone number is associated with a location in this state.

(f) The surcharge amounts imposed under this section shall be remitted by every seller, except a service supplier, as prescribed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), along with a return filed using electronic media. The department shall administer such remittance and returns as prescribed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001).

(g) Notwithstanding Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 41060) of Chapter 4, any seller,
 except a service supplier, required, or that elects, to remit amounts due under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) by electronic funds transfer pursuant to Article 1.2 (commencing with Section 6479.3) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 shall remit the surcharge upon prepaid mobile telephony service amounts due under this section by electronic funds transfer.

(h) The purchase in a retail transaction in this state of prepaid mobile telephony services, either alone or in combination with mobile data or other services, by a prepaid consumer is exempt from the surcharges if all of the following apply:

(1) The prepaid consumer is certified as eligible for the state lifeline program or federal lifeline program.

(2) The seller is
 authorized to provide lifeline service under the state lifeline program or federal lifeline program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 21.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Adjustment of Surcharge Amounts [41030. - 41032.]

41030.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall determine annually, on or before October 1, to be effective on January 1 of the following year, surcharge amounts pursuant to subdivision (b) that it estimates will produce sufficient revenue to fund the current fiscal year’s 911 and 988 costs.

(b) The surcharge amounts shall be determined annually by dividing the costs, including incremental costs, the Office of Emergency Services estimates for the current fiscal year of the following:

(1) The 911 costs approved pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, less the available balance in the State Emergency Telephone Number
 Account in the General Fund, by its estimate of the number of access lines to which the surcharge will apply per month for the period of January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the next succeeding calendar year, but in no event shall the surcharge amount in any month be greater than eighty cents ($0.80) per access line per month.

(2) For the 2023 and 2024 calendar years, the 988 surcharge shall be set at eight cents ($0.08) per access line per month.

(3) For determinations that are made applicable to the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2025, and each calendar year thereafter, the 988 surcharge shall be determined by dividing the 988 costs approved pursuant to Article 6.3 (commencing with Section 53123.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, less the available balance in the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund, by
 the Office of Emergency Services’ estimate of the number of access lines to which the surcharge will apply per month for the period of January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the next succeeding calendar year, but in no event shall the surcharge amount in any month be greater than thirty cents ($0.30) per access line per month.

(c) When determining the 911 surcharge amount pursuant to this section, the Office of Emergency Services shall include the costs it expects to incur to plan, test, implement, and operate Next Generation 911 technology and services, including text to 911 service, and alerts and warnings, consistent with the plan and timeline required by Section 53121 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Service suppliers shall report the total number of access lines to the Office of Emergency Services, on or before August 1, for the previous period of January 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(2) The total number of access lines required to be reported in paragraph (1) shall include all lines from the categories of wireline communication service line, wireless communication service line, prepaid mobile telephony service line, and VoIP service line. The number of access line figures shall be reported individually for these categories.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Emergency Services, within 45 days of receiving a request from the department, shall provide the department the name and address of each service supplier, each service supplier’s total number of access lines, as provided in paragraph (2) for the prior calendar
 year, and any other information the department deems necessary to conduct its responsibilities under this part.

(e) The
 Office of Emergency Services shall perform a validation of the number of access lines using subscription data or other comparable data collected by appropriate federal or state agencies. This subscription data or other comparable data shall be used to validate the access line data required to be reported by service suppliers in subdivision (d).

(f) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall notify the department of the surcharge amount imposed under this part, determined pursuant to this section on or before October 1 of each year.

(2) The surcharge imposed on the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services shall be
 equal to the amount set forth in subdivision (b) for each retail transaction in this state.

(g) (1) At least 30 days prior to determining the surcharge pursuant to subdivision (a), the Office of Emergency Services shall prepare a summary of the calculation of the proposed surcharge amounts and make it available to the public, the Legislature, the California Health and Human Services Agency and relevant departments, including the State Department of Health Care Services, and on its internet website.

(2) For determinations made on or before October 1, 2019, the summary shall contain all of the following:

(A) The prior year revenues to fund 911 costs, including, but not limited to, revenues
 from prepaid service.

(B) Projected expenses and revenues from all sources, including, but not limited to, prepaid service to fund 911 costs.

(C) The rationale for adjustment to the surcharges determined pursuant to subdivision (b).

(h) For purposes of this section, for the determination made by the Office of Emergency Services on or before October 1, 2019, that is applicable for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2020, and ending on December 31, 2020, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Service supplier” shall mean a person supplying an
 access line to a service user in this state.

(2) “Service user” means any person that subscribes for the right to utilize an access line in this state who is required to pay a surcharge under the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 12.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41031.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall make its determination of the 911 surcharge amount each year no later than October 1 and shall notify the department of the new amount, which shall be effective with respect to access lines and the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services on or after January 1 of the
 next succeeding calendar year.
